West Virginia, session 2026, SB695.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64-10-1. Department of Commerce. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on January 12, 2026, authorized under the authority of §5B-2-21 of this code, modified by the Department of Commerce to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on January 29, 2026, relating to the Department of Commerce (certification of a microgrid district or certification as a high impact data center, 145 CSR 20), is authorized.